Oklahoma, session 2025, SB495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 112, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 112. A. A petition or cross-petition for a divorce,


legal separation, or annulment must shall state whether or not the


parties have minor children of the marriage. If there are minor


children of the marriage, the court:



Req. No. 299 Page 1


1. Shall make provision for guardianship, custody, medical


care, support and education of the children;


2. Unless not in the best interests of the children, may


provide for the visitation of the noncustodial parent with any of


the children of the noncustodial parent; and


3. May modify or change any order whenever circumstances render


the change proper either before or after final judgment in the


action; provided, that the amount of the periodic child support


payment shall not be modified retroactively or payment of all or a


portion of the past due amount waived, except by mutual agreement of


the obligor and obligee, or if the obligee has assigned child


support rights to the Department of Human Services or other entity,


by agreement of the Department or other entity. Unless the parties


agree to the contrary, a completed child support computation form


provided for in Section 120 of this title shall be required to be


filed with the child support order.


The social security numbers of both parents and the child shall


be included on the child support order summary form provided for in


Section 120 of this title, which shall be submitted to the Central


Case Registry as provided for in Section 112A of this title with all


child support or paternity orders.


B. In any action in which there are minor unmarried children in


awarding or modifying the custody of the child or in appointing a


general guardian for the child, the court shall be guided by the

Req. No. 299 Page 2


provisions of Section 112.5 of this title and shall consider what


appears to be in the best interests of the child.


C. In awarding or modifying custody or visitation of a child,


if a party to the action alleges that the other party has committed


an act of child abuse against the child, or committed an act of


domestic violence against the party making the allegation or a


family or household member of either party, the court shall, before


considering any other best interest factors, hear and determine upon


competent admissible evidence the allegations set forth and enter


findings regarding any child abuse or domestic violence. The


evidentiary hearing for such determination shall be held within


sixty (60) days of the filing of a verified pleading; provided,


however, the court may issue any necessary emergency orders to


protect the child. If a parent makes a good-faith allegation based


on a reasonable belief supported by facts that the child is the


victim of child abuse or the effects of domestic violence, and if


that parent acts lawfully and in good faith in response to that


reasonable belief to protect the child or seek treatment for the


child, then that parent shall not be deprived of custody,


visitation, or contact with the child, or restricted in custody,


visitation, or contact, based solely on that belief or the


reasonable actions taken based on that belief. If the court finds a


pattern of child abuse or domestic violence by a parent, the court


shall award sole custody of the child to the non-offending parent or

Req. No. 299 Page 3


party and shall suspend visitation or award only supervised


visitation to the parent engaged in a pattern of abusive or violent


behavior. If the court finds that a party has not engaged in a


pattern of child abuse or domestic violence, the court may not


refuse to consider additional evidence of child abuse or domestic


violence presented later in the case. Upon a finding that a parent


has committed child abuse or domestic violence, the court may order


payment by the offending parent of court costs and fees including,


but not limited to, attorney and expert fees that are incurred by


the non-offending parent to prepare for and participate in the


evidentiary hearing.


D. 1. When it is in the best interests of a minor unmarried


child, the court shall:


a. assure children of frequent and continuing contact


with both parents after the parents have separated or


dissolved their marriage, and


b. encourage parents to share the rights and


responsibilities of child rearing in order to effect


this policy.


2. There shall be neither a legal preference nor a presumption


for or against joint legal custody, joint physical custody, or sole


custody.


3. When in the best interests of the child, custody shall be


awarded in a way which assures the frequent and continuing contact

Req. No. 299 Page 4


of the child with both parents. When awarding custody to either


parent, the court:


a. shall consider, among other facts, which parent is


more likely to allow the child or children frequent


and continuing contact with the noncustodial parent,


and


b. shall not prefer a parent as a custodian of the child


because of the gender of that parent.


4. In any action, there shall be neither a legal preference or


nor a presumption for or against private or public school or home-


schooling in awarding the custody of a child, or in appointing a


general guardian for the child.


5. Notwithstanding any custody determination made pursuant to


the Oklahoma Children’s Code, when a parent of a child is required


to be separated from a child due to military service, the court


shall not enter a final order modifying an existing custody order


until such time as the parent has completed the term of duty


requiring separation. For purposes of this paragraph:


a. in the case of a parent who is a member of the Army,


Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps or Coast Guard, the term


“military service” means a combat deployment,


contingency operation, or natural disaster requiring


the use of orders that do not permit any family member


to accompany the member,

Req. No. 299 Page 5


b. in the case of a parent who is a member of the


National Guard, the term “military service” means


service under a call to active service authorized by


the President of the United States or the Secretary of


Defense for a period of more than thirty (30)


consecutive days under 32 U.S.C. 502(f) for purposes


of responding to a national emergency declared by the


President and supported by federal funds. “Military


service” shall include any period during which a


member is absent from duty on account of sickness,


wounds, leave or other lawful cause, and


c. the court may enter a temporary custody or visitation


order pursuant to the requirements of the Deployed


Parents Custody and Visitation Act.


6. In making an order for custody, the court shall require


compliance with Section 112.3 of this title.


D. E. 1. Except for good cause shown, a pattern of failure to


allow court-ordered visitation may be determined to be contrary to


the best interests of the child and as such may be grounds for


modification of the child custody order.


2. For any action brought pursuant to the provisions of this


section which the court determines to be contrary to the best


interests of the child, the prevailing party shall be entitled to



Req. No. 299 Page 6


recover court costs, attorney fees and any other reasonable costs


and expenses incurred with the action.


E. F. Except as otherwise provided by Section 112.1A of this


title, any child shall be entitled to support by the parents until


the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. If a child is


regularly enrolled in and attending high school, as set forth in


Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, other means


of high school education, or an alternative high school education


program as a full-time student, the child shall be entitled to


support by the parents until the child graduates from high school or


until the age of twenty (20) years, whichever occurs first. Full-


time attendance shall include regularly scheduled breaks from the


school year. No hearing or further order is required to extend


support pursuant to this subsection after the child reaches the age


of eighteen (18) years.


F. G. In any case in which provision is made for the custody or


support of a minor child or enforcement of such order and before


hearing the matter or signing any orders, the court shall inquire


whether public assistance money or medical support has been provided


by the Department of Human Services, hereafter referred to as the


Department, for the benefit of each child. If public assistance


money, medical support, or child support services under the state


child support plan as provided in Section 237 of Title 56 of the


Oklahoma Statutes have been provided for the benefit of the child,

Req. No. 299 Page 7


the Department shall be a necessary party for the adjudication of


the debt due to the State of Oklahoma, as defined in Section 238 of


Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and for the adjudication of


paternity, child support, and medical insurance coverage for the


minor children in accordance with federal regulations. When an


action is filed, the petitioner shall give the Department notice of


the action according to Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The Department shall not be required to intervene in the


action to have standing to appear and participate in the action.


When the Department is a necessary party to the action, any orders


concerning paternity, child support, medical support, or the debt


due to the State of Oklahoma shall be approved and signed by the


Department.


G. H. In any case in which a child support order or custody


order or both is entered, enforced or modified, the court may make a


determination of the arrearages of child support.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-299 TEK 1/19/2025 5:37:30 AM











Req. No. 299 Page 8